Washington statutes.
RCW 10.19.060

Certification and filing of recognizances.

Every recognizance taken by any peace officer must be certified by him or her forthwith to the clerk of the court to which the defendant is recognized. The clerk must thereupon record the recognizance in the order book, and, from the time of filing, it has the same effect as if taken in open court.

[ 2010 c 8 s 1014; Code 1881 s 1035; 1873 p 230 s 215; 1854 p 114 s 79; RRS s 2088.]